Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-648
Permittee; preference in use of ground water.

The use of ground water pursuant to a permit granted by the Chief Water Officer under the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act shall be subject to and governed by section 46-613.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 11, p. 832;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 185;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 185.

Use of ground water pursuant to a permit is governed by section 46-613. Metropolitan Utilities Dist. v. Merritt Beach Co., 179 Neb. 783, 140 N.W.2d 626 (1966).